Hawaii statutes.
§431:10H-220 Requirement to offer inflation
protection; group and individual policies. (a) No insurer may offer a
long-term care insurance policy unless the insurer also offers to the
policyholder in addition to any other inflation protection the option to
purchase a policy that provides for benefit levels to increase with benefit
maximums or reasonable durations which are meaningful to account for reasonably
anticipated increases in the costs of long-term care services covered by the
policy. Insurers shall offer to each policyholder, at the time of purchase,
the option to purchase a policy with an inflation protection feature no less
favorable than one of the following:

(1) Increases benefit levels annually in a manner so
that the increases are compounded annually at a rate not less than five per
cent;

(2) Guarantees the insured individual the right to
periodically increase benefit levels without providing evidence of insurability
or health status so long as the option for the previous period has not been
declined. The amount of the additional benefit shall be no less than the
difference between the existing policy benefit and that benefit compounded
annually at a rate of at least five per cent for the period beginning with the
purchase of the existing benefit and extending until the year in which the
offer is made; or

(3) Covers a specified percentage of actual or
reasonable charges and does not include a maximum specified indemnity amount or
limit.

(b) Where the policy is issued to a group, the
required offer in subsection (a) shall be made to the group policyholder;
except if the policy is issued to a group defined in paragraph (4) under the
definition of "group long-term care insurance" in section 431:10H-104
other than to a continuing care retirement community, the offering shall be
made to each certificate holder.

(c) The offer in subsection (a) shall not be
required of life insurance policies or riders containing accelerated long-term
care benefits.

(d) Insurers shall include the following information
in or with the outline of coverage:

(1) A graphic comparison of the benefit levels of a
policy that increases benefits over the policy period with a policy that does
not increase benefits. The graphic comparison shall show benefit levels over
at least a twenty-year period.

(2) Any expected premium increases or additional
premiums to pay for automatic or optional benefit increases.

(e) Inflation protection benefit increases
under a policy which contains these benefits shall continue without regard to
an insured's age, claim status or claim history, or the length of time the
person has been insured under the policy.

(f) An offer of inflation protection that
provides for automatic benefit increases shall include an offer of a premium
which the insurer expects to remain constant. The offer shall disclose in a
conspicuous manner that the premium may change in the future unless the premium
is guaranteed to remain constant.

(g) Inflation protection in subsection (a)(2)
shall be included in a long-term care insurance policy unless the insurer
obtains a rejection of inflation protection signed by the policyholder as
required in subsection (h).

(h) The rejection shall be considered a part
of the application and shall state:

"I have reviewed
the outline of coverage and the graphs that compare the benefits and premiums
of this policy with and without inflation protection. Specifically, I have
reviewed Plans _________________, and I REJECT INFLATION PROTECTION."

[L 1999, c 93, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §96]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next